Illinois, session 104th, SB2449.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Deposit of State Moneys Act is amended by 5changing Section 22.5 as follows: 6    (15 ILCS 520/22.5)  (from Ch. 130, par. 41a)7    (For force and effect of certain provisions, see Section 890 of P.A. 94-79)9    Sec. 22.5. Permitted investments. The State Treasurer may 10invest and reinvest any State money in the State Treasury 11which is not needed for current expenditures due or about to 12become due, in obligations of the United States government or 13its agencies or of National Mortgage Associations established 14by or under the National Housing Act, 12 U.S.C. 1701 et seq., 15or in mortgage participation certificates representing 16undivided interests in specified, first-lien conventional 17residential Illinois mortgages that are underwritten, insured, 18guaranteed, or purchased by the Federal Home Loan Mortgage 19Corporation or in Affordable Housing Program Trust Fund Bonds 20or Notes as defined in and issued pursuant to the Illinois 21Housing Development Act. All such obligations shall be 22considered as cash and may be delivered over as cash by a State 23Treasurer to his successor.  SB2449- 2 -LRB104 11308 SPS 21394 b1    The State Treasurer may purchase any state bonds with any 2money in the State Treasury that has been set aside and held 3for the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds. 4The bonds shall be considered as cash and may be delivered over 5as cash by the State Treasurer to his successor.6    The State Treasurer may invest or reinvest any State money 7in the State Treasury that is not needed for current 8expenditures due or about to become due, or any money in the 9State Treasury that has been set aside and held for the payment 10of the principal of and interest on any State bonds, in bonds 11issued by counties or municipal corporations of the State of 12Illinois.13    The State Treasurer may invest or reinvest up to 5% of the 14College Savings Pool Administrative Trust Fund, the Illinois 15Public Treasurer Investment Pool (IPTIP) Administrative Trust 16Fund, and the State Treasurer's Administrative Fund that is 17not needed for current expenditures due or about to become 18due, in common or preferred stocks of publicly traded 19corporations, partnerships, or limited liability companies, 20organized in the United States, with assets exceeding 21$500,000,000 if: (i) the purchases do not exceed 1% of the 22corporation's or the limited liability company's outstanding 23common and preferred stock; (ii) no more than 10% of the total 24funds are invested in any one publicly traded corporation, 25partnership, or limited liability company; and (iii) the 26corporation or the limited liability company has not been   SB2449- 3 -LRB104 11308 SPS 21394 b1placed on the list of restricted companies by the Illinois 2Investment Policy Board under Section 1-110.16 of the Illinois 3Pension Code. 4    Whenever the total amount of vouchers presented to the 5Comptroller under Section 9 of the State Comptroller Act 6exceeds the funds available in the General Revenue Fund by 7$1,000,000,000 or more, then the State Treasurer may invest 8any State money in the State Treasury, other than money in the 9General Revenue Fund, Health Insurance Reserve Fund, Attorney 10General Court Ordered and Voluntary Compliance Payment 11Projects Fund, Attorney General Whistleblower Reward and 12Protection Fund, and Attorney General's State Projects and 13Court Ordered Distribution Fund, which is not needed for 14current expenditures, due or about to become due, or any money 15in the State Treasury which has been set aside and held for the 16payment of the principal of and the interest on any State bonds 17with the Office of the Comptroller in order to enable the 18Comptroller to pay outstanding vouchers. At any time, and from 19time to time outstanding, such investment shall not be greater 20than $2,000,000,000. Such investment shall be deposited into 21the General Revenue Fund or Health Insurance Reserve Fund as 22determined by the Comptroller. Such investment shall be repaid 23by the Comptroller with an interest rate tied to the London 24Interbank Offered Rate (LIBOR) or the Federal Funds Rate or an 25equivalent market established variable rate, but in no case 26shall such interest rate exceed the lesser of the penalty rate   SB2449- 4 -LRB104 11308 SPS 21394 b1established under the State Prompt Payment Act or the timely 2pay interest rate under Section 368a of the Illinois Insurance 3Code. The State Treasurer and the Comptroller shall enter into 4an intergovernmental agreement to establish procedures for 5such investments, which market established variable rate to 6which the interest rate for the investments should be tied, 7and other terms which the State Treasurer and Comptroller 8reasonably believe to be mutually beneficial concerning these 9investments by the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer and 10Comptroller shall also enter into a written agreement for each 11such investment that specifies the period of the investment, 12the payment interval, the interest rate to be paid, the funds 13in the State Treasury from which the State Treasurer will draw 14the investment, and other terms upon which the State Treasurer 15and Comptroller mutually agree. Such investment agreements 16shall be public records and the State Treasurer shall post the 17terms of all such investment agreements on the State 18Treasurer's official website. In compliance with the 19intergovernmental agreement, the Comptroller shall order and 20the State Treasurer shall transfer amounts sufficient for the 21payment of principal and interest invested by the State 22Treasurer with the Office of the Comptroller under this 23paragraph from the General Revenue Fund or the Health 24Insurance Reserve Fund to the respective funds in the State 25Treasury from which the State Treasurer drew the investment. 26Public Act 100-1107 shall constitute an irrevocable and   SB2449- 5 -LRB104 11308 SPS 21394 b1continuing authority for all amounts necessary for the payment 2of principal and interest on the investments made with the 3Office of the Comptroller by the State Treasurer under this 4paragraph, and the irrevocable and continuing authority for 5and direction to the Comptroller and State Treasurer to make 6the necessary transfers. 7    The State Treasurer may invest or reinvest any State money 8in the State Treasury that is not needed for current 9expenditure, due or about to become due, or any money in the 10State Treasury that has been set aside and held for the payment 11of the principal of and the interest on any State bonds, in any 12of the following:13        (1) Bonds, notes, certificates of indebtedness, 14    Treasury bills, or other securities now or hereafter 15    issued that are guaranteed by the full faith and credit of 16    the United States of America as to principal and interest.17        (2) Bonds, notes, debentures, or other similar 18    obligations of the United States of America, its agencies, 19    and instrumentalities, or other obligations that are 20    issued or guaranteed by supranational entities; provided, 21    that at the time of investment, the entity has the United 22    States government as a shareholder.23        (2.5) (Blank). Bonds, notes, debentures, or other 24    similar obligations of a foreign government, other than 25    the Republic of the Sudan, that are guaranteed by the full 26    faith and credit of that government as to principal and   SB2449- 6 -LRB104 11308 SPS 21394 b1    interest, but only if the foreign government has not 2    defaulted and has met its payment obligations in a timely 3    manner on all similar obligations for a period of at least 4    25 years immediately before the time of acquiring those 5    obligations.6        (3) Interest-bearing savings accounts, 7    interest-bearing certificates of deposit, 8    interest-bearing time deposits, or any other investments 9    constituting direct obligations of any bank as defined by 10    the Illinois Banking Act.11        (4) Interest-bearing accounts, certificates of 12    deposit, or any other investments constituting direct 13    obligations of any savings and loan associations 14    incorporated under the laws of this State or any other 15    state or under the laws of the United States.16        (5) Dividend-bearing share accounts, share certificate 17    accounts, or class of share accounts of a credit union 18    chartered under the laws of this State or the laws of the 19    United States; provided, however, the principal office of 20    the credit union must be located within the State of 21    Illinois.22        (6) Bankers' acceptances of banks whose senior 23    obligations are rated in the top 2 rating categories by 2 24    national rating agencies and maintain that rating during 25    the term of the investment and the bank has not been placed 26    on the list of restricted companies by the Illinois   SB2449- 7 -LRB104 11308 SPS 21394 b1    Investment Policy Board under Section 1-110.16 of the 2    Illinois Pension Code.3        (7) Short-term obligations of either corporations or 4    limited liability companies organized in the United States 5    with assets exceeding $500,000,000 if (i) the obligations 6    are rated at the time of purchase at one of the 3 highest 7    classifications established by at least 2 standard rating 8    services and mature not later than 270 days from the date 9    of purchase, (ii) the purchases do not exceed 10% of the 10    corporation's or the limited liability company's 11    outstanding obligations, (iii) no more than one-third of 12    the public agency's funds are invested in short-term 13    obligations of either corporations or limited liability 14    companies, and (iv) the corporation or the limited 15    liability company has not been placed on the list of 16    restricted companies by the Illinois Investment Policy 17    Board under Section 1-110.16 of the Illinois Pension Code.18        (7.5) Obligations of either corporations or limited 19    liability companies organized in the United States, that 20    have a significant presence in this State, with assets 21    exceeding $500,000,000 if: (i) the obligations are rated 22    at the time of purchase at one of the 3 highest 23    classifications established by at least 2 standard rating 24    services and mature more than 270 days, but less than 10 25    years, from the date of purchase; (ii) the purchases do 26    not exceed 10% of the corporation's or the limited   SB2449- 8 -LRB104 11308 SPS 21394 b1    liability company's outstanding obligations; (iii) no more 2    than one-third of the public agency's funds are invested 3    in such obligations of corporations or limited liability 4    companies; and (iv) the corporation or the limited 5    liability company has not been placed on the list of 6    restricted companies by the Illinois Investment Policy 7    Board under Section 1-110.16 of the Illinois Pension Code. 8        (8) Money market mutual funds registered under the 9    Investment Company Act of 1940.10        (9) The Public Treasurers' Investment Pool created 11    under Section 17 of the State Treasurer Act or in a fund 12    managed, operated, and administered by a bank.13        (10) Repurchase agreements of government securities 14    having the meaning set out in the Government Securities 15    Act of 1986, as now or hereafter amended or succeeded, 16    subject to the provisions of that Act and the regulations 17    issued thereunder.18        (11) Investments made in accordance with the 19    Technology Development Act.20        (12) Investments made in accordance with the Student 21    Investment Account Act.22        (13) Investments constituting direct obligations of a 23    community development financial institution, which is 24    certified by the United States Treasury Community 25    Development Financial Institutions Fund and is operating 26    in the State of Illinois.  SB2449- 9 -LRB104 11308 SPS 21394 b1        (14) Investments constituting direct obligations of a 2    minority depository institution, as designated by the 3    Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, that is operating 4    in the State of Illinois. 5        (15) Investments made in accordance with any other law 6    that authorizes the State Treasurer to invest or deposit 7    funds. 8    For purposes of this Section, "agencies" of the United 9States Government includes:10        (i) the federal land banks, federal intermediate 11    credit banks, banks for cooperatives, federal farm credit 12    banks, or any other entity authorized to issue debt 13    obligations under the Farm Credit Act of 1971 (12 U.S.C. 14    2001 et seq.) and Acts amendatory thereto;15        (ii) the federal home loan banks and the federal home 16    loan mortgage corporation;17        (iii) the Commodity Credit Corporation; and18        (iv) any other agency created by Act of Congress.19    The State Treasurer may lend any securities acquired under 20this Act. However, securities may be lent under this Section 21only in accordance with Federal Financial Institution 22Examination Council guidelines and only if the securities are 23collateralized at a level sufficient to assure the safety of 24the securities, taking into account market value fluctuation. 25The securities may be collateralized by cash or collateral 26acceptable under Sections 11 and 11.1.  SB2449- 10 -LRB104 11308 SPS 21394 b1(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 101-206, eff. 8-2-19; 2101-586, eff. 8-26-19; 101-657, eff. 3-23-21; 102-297, eff. 38-6-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22.)